Arkansas, session 2025, HB1958.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-1-128(a) — (e), as amended by Acts 2025,
No. 205, concerning the creation of a policy regarding use of technology
resources and cybersecurity by public entities, are amended to read as
follows:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that
can, based on a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions influencing a real or virtual environment;
(2) "Automated decision tool" means a system or service that
uses artificial intelligence and has been specifically developed and
marketed, or specifically modified, to make or to be a controlling factor in
making consequential decisions;
(1)(3) “Employee” means a person employed by a public entity;
(2)(4) “Public entity” means an instrumentality funded in whole
or in part by taxpayer funds, including without limitation:
(A) The Department of Agriculture;
*LJH072*
04-09-2025 14:29:46 LJH072

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1958
(B) The Department of Commerce;
(C) The Department of Corrections;
(D) The Department of Education;
(E) The Department of Energy and Environment;
(F) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(G) The Department of Health;
(H) The Department of Human Services;
(I) The Department of Inspector General;
(J) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(K) The Department of the Military;
(L) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(M) The Department of Public Safety;
(N) The Department of Transformation and Shared
Administrative Services;
(O) The Department of Veterans Affairs;
(P) The office of a constitutional officer;
(Q) A political subdivision of the state;
(R) A public school district;
(S) A public school district board of directors;
(T) An open-enrollment public charter school;
(U) An institution of higher education;
(V) The State Highway Commission;
(W) The Arkansas Department of Transportation; or
(X) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission;
(3)(5) “State educational entity” means an entity with an
educational purpose that is funded in whole or in part by taxpayer funds that
is, including without limitation:
(A) A public school district;
(B) A public school district board of directors; and
(C) An open-enrollment charter school;
(4)(6) “State entity” means:
(A) The Department of Agriculture;
(B) The Department of Commerce;
(C) The Department of Corrections;
(D) The Department of Education;
(E) The Department of Energy and Environment;
04-09-2025 14:29:46 LJH072

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1958
(F) The Department of Finance and Administration;
(G) The Department of Health;
(H) The Department of Human Services;
(I) The Department of Inspector General;
(J) The Department of Labor and Licensing;
(K) The Department of the Military;
(L) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;
(M) The Department of Public Safety;
(N) The Department of Shared Administrative Services;
(O) The Department of Veterans Affairs;
(P) The State Highway Commission;
(Q) The Arkansas Department of Transportation;
(R) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission; and
(S) An institution of higher education; and
(5)(7) “Technology resources” means:
(A) The machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, including computers, word processors,
terminals, telephones, cables, software, and related products;
(B) The devices used to process information through
electronic capture, collection, storage, manipulation, transmission,
retrieval, and presentation of information in the form of data, text, voice,
or image and includes telecommunications and office automation functions;
(C) Any component related to information processing and
wired and wireless telecommunications, including data processing and
telecommunications hardware, software, services, planning, personnel,
facilities, and training;
(D) The procedures, equipment, and software that are
designed, built, operated, and maintained to collect, record, process, store,
retrieve, display, and transmit information, and the associated personnel,
including consultants and contractors; and
(E) All electronic mail email accounts issued by a public
entity.
(b) A public entity shall:
(1) Create a technology resources policy that defines the
authorized use of technology resources for the public entity;
(2)(A) Develop a cybersecurity policy for all technology
04-09-2025 14:29:46 LJH072

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1958
resources of the public entity based on the standards and guidelines set by
the State Cybersecurity Office.
(B) Subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not apply
to political subdivisions of the state; and
(3) Create an artificial intelligence and automated decision
tool policy that:
(A) Defines the authorized use of artificial intelligence
and automated decision tools for the public entity; and
(B) Requires an authorized human employee or designee to
make any final decision in the course of his or her employment, regardless of
what artificial intelligence or automated decision tool the employee or
designee recommends; and
(3)(4)(A) Develop a training program for all employees of the
public entity concerning the technology resources policy, and the
cybersecurity policy, and the artificial intelligence and automated decision
tool policy, including training on the appropriate use of artificial
intelligence and automated decision tools in deciding an outcome in the
course of an employee's employment.
(B) A political subdivision of the state is not required
to develop a training program under this section for a cybersecurity policy.
(c)(1) The technology resources policy and artificial intelligence and
automated decision tool policy for each state entity shall be available to
the public upon request.
(2) The Department of Education, in coordination with the State
Cybersecurity Office, shall:
(A) Develop technology resources and artificial
intelligence and automated decision tool policies that shall be used by each
type of state educational institution; and
(B) Make the policies developed under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section available to the public upon request.
(d) Each technology resources and artificial intelligence and
automated decision tool policy shall include prohibitions on the use of a
public entity's technology resources and artificial intelligence and
automated decision tools, including without limitation that a public entity's
technology resources shall not be used to:
(1) Express a personal political opinion to an elected official
04-09-2025 14:29:46 LJH072

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1958
unless the opinion is:
(A) Within the scope of the employee's regular job duties;
or
(B) Requested by an elected official or public entity;
(2) Engage in lobbying an elected official on a personal opinion
if the employee is not a registered lobbyist for the public entity;
(3) Engage in illegal activities or activities otherwise
prohibited by federal law or state law; or
(4) Intentionally override or avoid the security and system
integrity procedures of the public entity.
(e) A public entity shall create a disciplinary procedure for a
violation of the public entity's technology resources and artificial
intelligence and automated decision tool policy concerning authorized use of
technology resources.

/s/S. Meeks




















04-09-2025 14:29:46 LJH072